Utah statutes.
57-4a-4.   Presumptions.
(1)  A recorded document creates the following presumptions regarding title to
the real property affected:
(a)  the document is genuine and was executed voluntarily by the person
purporting to execute it;
(b)  the person executing the document and the person on whose behalf it is
executed are the persons they purport to be;
(c)  the person executing the document was neither incompetent nor a minor at
any relevant time;
(d)  delivery occurred notwithstanding any lapse of time between dates on the
document and the date of recording;
(e)  any necessary consideration was given;
(f)  the grantee, transferee, or beneficiary of an interest created or
described by the document acted in good faith at all relevant times;
(g)  a person executing a document as an agent, attorney in fact, officer of
an organization, or in a fiduciary or official capacity:
(i)  held the position he purported to hold and acted within the scope of his
authority;
(ii)  in the case of an officer of an organization, was authorized under all
applicable laws to act on behalf of the organization; and
(iii)  in the case of an agent, his agency was not revoked, and he acted for a
principal who was neither incompetent nor a minor at any relevant time;
(h)  a person executing the document as an individual:
(i)  was unmarried on the effective date of the document; or
(ii)  if it otherwise appears from the document that the person was married on
the effective date of the document, the grantee was a bona fide purchaser and
the grantor received adequate and full consideration in money or money's worth
so that the joinder of the nonexecuting spouse was not required under Sections
75-2-201 through 75-2-207;
(i)  if the document purports to be executed pursuant to or to be a final
determination in a judicial or administrative proceeding, or to be executed
pursuant to a power of eminent domain, the court, official body, or condemnor
acted within its jurisdiction and all steps required for the execution of the
document were taken; and
(j)  recitals and other statements of fact in a document, including without
limitation recitals concerning mergers or name changes of organizations, are
true.
(2)  The presumptions stated in Subsection (1) arise even though the document
purports only to release a claim or to convey any right, title, or interest of
the person executing it or the person on whose behalf it is executed.
